Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.030

Examinations—Subjects—Grades.

Examinations for license to practice chiropractic shall be developed and administered, or approved, or both, by the commission according to the method deemed by it to be the most practicable and expeditious to test the applicant's qualifications. The commission may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing authorities. The applicant shall be designated by a number instead of his or her name, so that the identity shall not be discovered or disclosed to the members of the commission until after the examination papers are graded.

Examination subjects may include the following: Anatomy, physiology, spinal anatomy, microbiology-public health, general diagnosis, neuromuscularskeletal diagnosis, X-ray, principles of chiropractic and adjusting, as taught by chiropractic schools and colleges, and any other subject areas consistent with chapter 18.25 RCW. The commission shall set the standards for passing the examination. The commission may enact additional requirements for testing administered by the national board of chiropractic examiners.

[ 1995 c 198 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 111; 1989 c 258 s 4; 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 10; 1959 c 53 s 4; 1919 c 5 s 6; RRS s 10101.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 18.25.0192.

Hiring assistants for examinations: RCW 18.25.025.